Hawaii statutes.
[Article 31]

portable electronics insurance

[§431:31-101] Definitions. For
purposes of this article:

"Customer" means a person who
purchases portable electronics or services.

"Enrolled customer" means a customer
who elects coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy issued to a
vendor of portable electronics.

"Location" means any physical
location in the State or any website, call-center site, or similar location
directed to residents of the State.

"Portable electronics" means
electronic devices that are portable in nature, and the accessories and
services related to the use of the device.

"Portable electronics insurance"
means insurance providing coverage for the repair or replacement of portable
electronics, which may provide coverage for portable electronics against any
one or more of the following: loss, theft, inoperability due to mechanical
failure, malfunction, damage, or other similar causes. The term does not
include:

(1) A service contract, as defined by section 481X-2;

(2) A policy of insurance covering a seller's or
manufacturer's obligations under a warranty; or

(3) A homeowner's, renter's, private passenger
automobile, commercial multi-peril, or similar insurance policy.

"Portable electronics transaction"
means:

(1) The sale or lease of portable electronics by a
vendor to a customer; or

(2) The sale of a service related to the use of
portable electronics by a vendor to a customer.

"Supervising entity" means a business
entity that is a licensed insurer or insurance producer that is appointed or
authorized by an insurer to supervise the administration of a portable
electronics insurance program.

"Vendor" means a person in the
business of directly or indirectly engaging in portable electronics
transactions. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next